New Jersey, session 222, S4121.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  The State of New Jersey shall participate in the federal tax credit program for contributions of individuals to scholarship granting organizations established pursuant to section 25F of the federal Internal Revenue Code of 1986, 26 U.S.C.s. 25F, for all taxable years beginning after December 31, 2026.  The Commissioner of Education shall annually provide to the United States Secretary of the Treasury such information as is required pursuant to section 25F of the federal Internal Revenue Code of 1986, 26 U.S.C.s. 25F, in order for the State to participate in the federal tax credit for contributions of individuals to scholarship granting organizations, including a list of all scholarship granting organizations located in the State that meet the requirements of section 25F of the federal Internal Revenue Code of 1986, 26 U.S.C.s. 25F. 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.